Tennessee statutes. Title 35 Fiduciaries And Trust Estates
Chapter 2

Uniform Fiduciaries Act

35-2-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Uniform Fiduciaries Act.”

Acts 1953, ch. 82, § 14 (Williams, § 9596.31); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 35-201.

Cross-References. Bonds of fiduciaries, §§ 8-19-307, 35-50-111.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (5th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 737, 740.

Law Reviews.

Some Aspects of Estate Planning in Tennessee (Alec Brock Stevenson), 2 Vand. L. Rev. 265 (1949).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: A Fresh Look at State Asset Protection Trust Statutes, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1741 (2014).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: Comment, Federalizing Principles of Donative Intent and Unanticipated Circumstances, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1931 (2014).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: Comment, Is Federalization of Charity Law All Bad? What States Can Learn from the Internal Revenue Code, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1621 (2014).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: Comment, Pro and Con (Law): Considering the Irrevocable Nongrantor Trust Technique, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1999 (2014).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: Comment, The Stored Communications Act and Digital Assets, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1729 (2014).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: Destructive Federal Preemption of State Wealth Transfer Law in Beneficiary Designation Cases: Hillman Doubles Down on Egelhoff, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1665 (2014).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: Disclaimers and Federalism, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1871 (2014).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: Federal Visions of Private Family Support, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1835 (2014).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: In Search of the Probate Exception, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1533 (2014).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: Introduction, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1531 (2014).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: Probate Law Meets the Digital Age, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1697 (2014).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: Strange Bedfellows: The Federal Constitution, Out-of-State Nongrantor Accumulation Trusts, and the Complete Avoidance of State Income Taxation, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1945 (2014).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: The Creeping Federalization of Wealth-Transfer Law, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1635 (2014).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: Unconstitutional Perpetual Trusts, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1769 (2014).

Collateral References.

Enforceability of contractual right, in which fiduciary has interest, to purchase property of estate or trust. 6 A.L.R.4th 786.

Payment or distribution under invalid instruction as breach of trustee's duty. 6 A.L.R.4th 1196.

Uniform Fiduciaries Act, construction and application of provisions of, affecting rights and obligations arising from payment of personal obligations with trust funds. 114 A.L.R. 1088.

35-2-102. Chapter definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Bank” includes any person or association of persons, whether incorporated or not, carrying on the business of banking;

“Fiduciary” includes a trustee under any trust, expressed, implied, resulting or constructive, executor, administrator, personal representative, guardian, conservator, curator, receiver, trustee in bankruptcy, assignee for the benefit of creditors, partner, agent, officer of a corporation, public or private, public officer, or any other person acting in a fiduciary capacity for any person, trust or estate;

“Person” includes a corporation, partnership, or other association, or two (2) or more persons having a joint or common interest;

“Principal” includes any person to whom a fiduciary as such owes an obligation; and

“Savings institution” includes a federal or state savings and loan association or savings bank.

A thing is done “in good faith,” within the meaning of this chapter, when it is in fact done honestly, whether it is done negligently or not.

Acts 1953, ch. 82, § 1 (Williams, § 9596.18); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 35-202; Acts 1985, ch. 167, § 1; 1988, ch. 854, § 13.

Law Reviews.

Ethics — Petty v. Privette: Exclusion of Attorney Liability in the Area of Estate Administration, 23 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 687 (1993).

35-2-103. Application of payments made to fiduciaries — Validity of right or title acquired.

A person who in good faith pays or transfers to a fiduciary any money or other property, which the fiduciary as such is authorized to receive, is not responsible for the proper application thereof by the fiduciary, and any right or title acquired from the fiduciary in consideration of such payment or transfer is not invalid in consequence of a misapplication by the fiduciary.

Acts 1953, ch. 82, § 2 (Williams, § 9596.19); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 35-203.

35-2-104. Transfer of negotiable instrument by fiduciary.

If any negotiable instrument payable or endorsed to a fiduciary as such is endorsed by the fiduciary, or if any negotiable instrument payable or endorsed to the principal is endorsed by a fiduciary empowered to endorse such instrument on behalf of the principal, the endorsee is not bound to inquire whether the fiduciary is committing a breach of the fiduciary's obligation as fiduciary in endorsing or delivering the instrument, and is not chargeable with notice that the fiduciary is committing a breach of the obligation as fiduciary unless the endorsee takes the instrument with actual knowledge of such breach or with knowledge of such facts that the action in taking the instrument amounts to bad faith. If, however, such instrument is transferred by the fiduciary in payment of or as security for a personal debt of the fiduciary to the actual knowledge of the creditor, or is transferred in any transaction known by the transferee to be for the personal benefit of the fiduciary, the creditor or other transferee is liable to the principal if the fiduciary in fact commits a breach of the obligation as fiduciary in transferring the instrument.

Acts 1953, ch. 82, § 4 (Williams, § 9596.21); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 35-205.

35-2-105. Check drawn by fiduciary payable to third person.

If a check or other bill of exchange is drawn by a fiduciary as such, or in the name of the principal by a fiduciary empowered to draw such instrument in the name of the principal, the payee is not bound to inquire whether the fiduciary is committing a breach of the fiduciary's obligation as fiduciary in drawing or delivering the instrument, and is not chargeable with notice that the fiduciary is committing a breach of the obligation as fiduciary unless the payee takes the instrument with actual knowledge of such breach or with knowledge of such facts that the action in taking the instrument amounts to bad faith. If, however, such instrument is payable to a personal creditor of the fiduciary and delivered to the creditor in payment of or as security for a personal debt of the fiduciary to the actual knowledge of the creditor, or is drawn and delivered in any transaction known by the payee to be for the personal benefit of the fiduciary, the creditor or other payee is liable to the principal if the fiduciary in fact commits a breach of the obligation as fiduciary in drawing or delivering the instrument.

Acts 1953, ch. 82, § 5 (Williams, § 9596.22); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 35-206.

35-2-106. Check drawn by and payable to fiduciary — Uniform Veterans' Guardianship Act unaffected.

If a check or other bill of exchange is drawn by a fiduciary as such or in the name of the principal by a fiduciary empowered to draw such instrument in the name of the principal, payable to the fiduciary personally, or payable to a third person and by the third person transferred to the fiduciary, and is thereafter transferred by the fiduciary, whether in payment of a personal debt of the fiduciary or otherwise, the transferee is not bound to inquire whether the fiduciary is committing a breach of the fiduciary's obligation as fiduciary in transferring the instrument, and is not chargeable with notice that the fiduciary is committing a breach of the obligation as fiduciary unless the transferee takes the instrument with actual knowledge of such breach or with knowledge of such facts that the action in taking the instrument amounts to bad faith, except and provided that title 34, chapter 5, being the Uniform Veterans' Guardianship Act, is not by this chapter amended.

This chapter shall not apply in any situation governed by the Uniform Veterans' Guardianship Act.

Acts 1953, ch. 82, § 6 (Williams, § 9596.23); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 35-207.

35-2-107. Deposit in name of fiduciary as such — Drawing check.

If a deposit is made in a bank or savings institution to the credit of a fiduciary as such, the bank or savings institution is authorized to pay the amount of the deposit or any part thereof upon the check of the fiduciary, signed with the name in which such deposit is entered, without being liable to the principal, unless the bank or savings institution pays the check with actual knowledge that the fiduciary is committing a breach of the fiduciary's obligation as fiduciary in drawing the check or with knowledge of such facts that its action in paying the check amounts to bad faith. If, however, such a check is payable to the drawee bank or savings institution and is delivered to it in payment of or as security for a personal debt of the fiduciary to it, the bank or savings institution is liable to the principal if the fiduciary in fact commits a breach of the obligation as fiduciary in drawing or delivering the check except as provided in § 35-2-106.

Acts 1953, ch. 82, § 7 (Williams, § 9596.24); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 35-208; Acts 1985, ch. 167, § 2.

35-2-108. Deposit in name of principal — Drawing checks.

If a check is drawn upon the account of the principal in a bank or savings institution by a fiduciary who is empowered to draw checks upon the principal's account, the bank or savings institution is authorized to pay such check without being liable to the principal, unless the bank or savings institution pays the check with actual knowledge that the fiduciary is committing a breach of the fiduciary's obligation as fiduciary in drawing such check, or with knowledge of such facts that its action in paying the check amounts to bad faith. If, however, such a check is payable to the drawee bank or savings institution and is delivered to it in payment of or as security for a personal debt of the fiduciary to it, the bank or savings institution is liable to the principal if the fiduciary in fact commits a breach of the obligation as fiduciary in drawing or delivering the check.

Acts 1953, ch. 82, § 8 (Williams, § 9596.25); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 35-209; Acts 1985, ch. 167, § 2.

35-2-109. Deposit in fiduciary's personal account — Drawing checks.

If a fiduciary makes a deposit in a bank or savings institution to the fiduciary's personal credit of checks drawn by the fiduciary upon an account in the fiduciary's own name as fiduciary, or of checks payable to the fiduciary as fiduciary, or of checks drawn by the fiduciary upon an account in the name of the principal if the fiduciary is empowered to draw checks thereon, or of checks payable to the principal and endorsed by the fiduciary, if the fiduciary is empowered to endorse such checks, or if the fiduciary otherwise makes a deposit of funds held by the fiduciary as fiduciary, the bank or savings institution receiving such deposit is not bound to inquire whether the fiduciary is committing thereby a breach of the obligation as fiduciary. The bank or savings institution is authorized to pay the amount of the deposit or any part thereof upon the personal check of the fiduciary without being liable to the principal unless the bank or savings institution receives the deposit or pays the check with actual knowledge that the fiduciary is committing a breach of the obligation as fiduciary in making such deposit or in drawing such check or with knowledge of such facts that its action in receiving the deposit or paying the check amounts to bad faith.

Acts 1953, ch. 82, § 9 (Williams, § 9596.26); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 35-210; Acts 1985, ch. 167, § 2.

35-2-110. Deposit in names of two or more trustees — Drawing checks.

When a deposit is made in a bank or savings institution in the name of two (2) or more persons as fiduciaries and a check is drawn upon the fiduciary account by any fiduciary or fiduciaries authorized by the other fiduciary or fiduciaries to draw checks upon the fiduciary account, neither the payee nor other holder nor the bank or savings institution is bound to inquire whether it is a breach of trust to authorize such fiduciary or fiduciaries to draw checks upon the fiduciary account, and is not liable unless the circumstances be such that the action of the payee or other holder or the bank or savings institution amounts to bad faith.

Acts 1953, ch. 82, § 10 (Williams, § 9596.27); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 35-211; Acts 1985, ch. 167, § 2; 1988, ch. 854, § 14.

35-2-111. Applicability of chapter — Cases not provided for.

This chapter is applicable to state and federal savings and loan associations and savings banks. In the event of a conflict between this chapter and a law on the same subject relating specifically to state or federal savings and loan associations or savings banks, the specific law shall be controlling.

In any case not provided for in this chapter, the rules of law and equity, including the law merchant and those rules of law and equity relating to trusts, agency, negotiable instruments and banking, shall continue to apply.

Knowledge on the part of the bank or savings institution of the existence of a fiduciary relationship or the terms of the relationship shall not impose any duty or liability on the bank or savings institution for any action of the fiduciary.

A bank or savings institution has no duty to establish an account for a fiduciary or to limit transactions in an account so established unless, in its discretion, it contracts in writing with the fiduciary to establish or limit transactions with respect to such an account; provided, that this shall not preclude a court from temporarily enjoining or restraining the removal of funds from an existing account by a bank or savings institution over which the court exercises personal jurisdiction.

Acts 1953, ch. 82, § 12 (Williams, § 9596.29); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 35-213; Acts 1985, ch. 168, § 1; 1993, ch. 175, § 1.

35-2-112. Uniformity of interpretation.

This chapter shall be so interpreted and construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law of those states which enact it.

Acts 1953, ch. 82, § 13 (Williams, § 9596.30); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 35-214.